Missouri, session 2026, HB2884.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 86.213, 104.200, 104.490, 104.1060, 104.1092, and 169.450,
RSMo, are repealed and seven new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
86.213, 104.200, 104.490, 104.1060, 104.1092, 105.695, and 169.450, to read as follows:
86.213. 1. The general administration and the responsibility for the proper operation
of the retirement system and for making effective the provisions of sections 86.200 to 86.366
are hereby vested in a board of trustees of nine persons. The board shall be constituted as
follows:
(1) The comptroller of the city, ex officio. If the comptroller is absent from any
meeting of the board of trustees for any cause whatsoever, the comptroller may be represented
by either the deputy comptroller or the first assistant comptroller who in such case shall have
full power to act as a member of the said board of trustees;
(2) Two members to be appointed by the mayor of the city, provided that, effective
October 1, 2026, the mayor shall appoint one member to serve a term of one year and
one to serve a term of two years and thereafter, each appointee to serve for a term of two
years, except the mayor shall not appoint the police chief of the municipal police force or the
city's director of public safety;
(3) Three members who are actively commissioned officers of the municipal
police force of any city not within a county to be elected by [the] those members of the
retirement system who are actively commissioned officers of the municipal police force of
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HBs 2884 & 1655 2
[the] any city not within a county for a term of three years; provided, however, that the term
of office of the first three members so elected shall begin immediately upon their election and
one such member's term shall expire one year from the date the retirement system becomes
operative, another such member's term shall expire two years from the date the retirement
system becomes operative and the other such member's term shall expire three years from the
date the retirement system becomes operative; provided, further, that such members shall be
members of the system and hold office only while members of the system;
(4) Three members who shall be retired members of the retirement system to be
elected by [the] those retired members of the retirement system for a term of three years;
except that, the term of office of the first two members so elected shall begin immediately
upon their election and one such member's term shall expire two years from the date of
election and the other such member's term shall expire three years from the date of election.
2. Any member elected chairman of the board of trustees may serve without term
limitations.
3. Each actively commissioned elected trustee shall be granted travel time by the St.
Louis metropolitan police department to attend any and all functions that have been
authorized by the board of trustees of the police retirement system of St. Louis. Travel time,
with compensation, for a trustee shall not exceed thirty days in any board fiscal year.
4. Members appointed by the mayor of the city pursuant to subdivision (2) of
subsection 1 of this section shall continue to serve until their successors have been
appointed.
104.200. Should any error in any records result in any member or beneficiary
receiving more or less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the records been
correct, the board shall correct such error, and, as far as practicable, to recover any
overpayments, may accept single sum or installment repayments or make future
payments in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member
or beneficiary was entitled shall be paid[, and to this end may recover any overpayments]
until the overpayment is recovered in full. In all cases in which such error has been made,
no such error shall be corrected unless the system discovers or is notified of such error within
ten years after the member's annuity starting date or the date of error, whichever occurs later.
In cases of fraud, any error discovered shall be corrected without concern for the amount of
time that has passed.
104.490. 1. Should any error result in any member or beneficiary receiving more or
less than he or she would have been entitled to receive had the error not occurred, the board
shall correct such error, and, as far as practicable, to recover any overpayments, may accept
single sum or installment repayments or make future payments in such a manner that the
actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such member or beneficiary was entitled shall be

HCS HBs 2884 & 1655 3
paid[, and to this end may recover any overpayments] until the overpayment is recovered in
full. In all cases in which such error has been made, no such error shall be corrected unless
the system discovers or is notified of such error within ten years after the member's annuity
starting date or the date of error, whichever occurs later. In cases of fraud, any error
discovered shall be corrected without concern to the amount of time that has passed.
2. A person who knowingly makes a false statement, or falsifies or permits to be
falsified a record of the system, in an attempt to defraud the system is subject to fine or
imprisonment pursuant to the Missouri revised statutes.
3. The board of trustees of the Missouri state employees' retirement system shall
cease paying benefits to any survivor or beneficiary who is charged with the intentional
killing of a member without legal excuse or justification. A survivor or beneficiary who is
convicted of such charge shall no longer be entitled to receive benefits. If the survivor or
beneficiary is not convicted of such charge, the board shall resume payment of benefits and
shall pay the survivor or beneficiary any benefits that were suspended pending resolution of
such charge.
104.1060. 1. Should any error result in any person receiving more or less than the
person would have been entitled to receive had the error not occurred, the board shall correct
such error, and, as far as practicable, to recover any overpayments, may accept single sum
or installment repayments or make future payments in such a manner that the actuarial
equivalent of the annuity to which such person was entitled shall be paid[, and to this end may
recover any overpayments] until the overpayment is recovered in full. In all cases in which
such error has been made, no such error shall be corrected unless the system discovers or is
notified of such error within ten years after the member's annuity starting date or the date of
error, whichever occurs later. In cases of fraud, any error discovered shall be corrected
without concern to the amount of time that has passed.
2. A person who knowingly makes a false statement, or falsifies or permits to be
falsified a record of the system, in an attempt to defraud the system shall be subject to fine or
imprisonment under the Missouri revised statutes.
3. A board shall not pay an annuity to any survivor or beneficiary who is charged with
the intentional killing of a member, retiree or survivor without legal excuse or justification. A
survivor or beneficiary who is convicted of such charge shall no longer be entitled to receive
an annuity. If the survivor or beneficiary is not convicted of such charge, the board shall
resume annuity payments and shall pay the survivor or beneficiary any annuity payments that
were suspended pending resolution of such charge.
104.1092. 1. In lieu of retirement annuity benefits otherwise payable under the
closed plan or year 2000 plan, any member who has terminated employment, is entitled to a
deferred annuity, and has not yet reached normal retirement age or eligibility may make a

HCS HBs 2884 & 1655 4
one-time election to receive a lump sum payment equal to a percentage of the present value of
such member's deferred annuity should a board choose to establish such a program by board
rule pursuant to section 104.1063.
2. Any such election under subsection 1 of this section may be made by the member
beginning on [a date as established by the board under such program but not] or after [May
31, 2018. After May 31, 2018, no such election shall be made and retirement annuity benefits
shall only be paid as otherwise provided by law under this chapter] January 1, 2027.
3. Any such member making such election under subsection 1 of this section shall
forfeit all such member's creditable or credited service and future rights to receive retirement
annuity benefits from the system under this chapter and shall not be eligible to receive any
long-term disability benefits. If such member subsequently becomes an employee, such
member shall be considered a new employee with no prior credited service and shall be
subject to the provisions of section 104.1091.
105.695. 1. No contribution or expenditure of system funds shall be made
directly by any public pension system to advocate, support, or oppose the passage or
defeat of any ballot measure or the nomination or election of any candidate for public
office. Nor shall any system funds pay any debts or obligations of any committee
supporting or opposing such ballot measures or candidates.
2. Nothing in this section shall prohibit retirement systems and their employees
from educating and informing members and the public about potential impacts to the
system through regular system programs, processes, and job duties.
3. For the purposes of this section, the term "system" shall be defined as any
retirement system established by the state of Missouri or any political subdivision or
instrumentality of the state for the purpose of providing plan benefits for elected or
appointed public officials or employees of the state of Missouri or any political
subdivision or instrumentality of the state.
169.450. 1. The general administration and responsibility for the proper operation of
the retirement system and for making effective the provisions of sections 169.410 to 169.540
are hereby vested in a board of trustees of thirteen persons, as follows:
(1) Four trustees to be appointed for terms of four years by the board of education;
provided, however, that their terms shall be fixed so the terms of one of the trustees so
appointed shall expire each year. The members of such board of trustees appointed by the
board of education may be members of the board of education or other individuals deemed
qualified to hold such positions by the board of education;
(2) Four trustees to be elected for terms of four years by and from the active members
of the retirement system who shall hold office as trustees only while active members;
provided, however, that their terms shall be fixed so that the terms of one of the trustees so

HCS HBs 2884 & 1655 5
elected shall expire each year; and provided further, that not more than two of such persons
shall be teachers and two shall be nonteachers. For the purposes of this subsection, a school
administrator shall not be eligible for the positions established pursuant to this subdivision
and shall be eligible for the position established pursuant to subdivision (4) of this subsection;
(3) Two trustees, who shall be retired members, to be elected for terms of four years
by and from the retired members of the retirement system; provided, however, that the terms
of office of the first two trustees so elected shall begin immediately upon their election and
shall expire two and four years from the date of their election, respectively; and provided
further, that not more than one of such persons shall be a teacher and one shall be a
nonteacher;
(4) One member, who shall be a school administrator, to be elected for a term of four
years by and from the active members of the retirement system who shall hold office as a
trustee only while an active member; except that, the initial term of office of such trustee shall
expire on December 31, 1999;
(5) Two trustees to be appointed for terms of four years by the Missouri Charter
Public School Association; provided, however, that the terms of office of the first two trustees
so elected shall begin immediately upon their election and shall expire two and four years
from the date of their election, respectively. The members of such board of trustees appointed
by the Missouri Charter Public School Association shall have experience or qualifications
relevant to public charter schools and the retirement system, and at least one such member
shall be a teacher. The appointment of the trustees shall be subject to the same rules and
regulations applicable to other trustees, including, but not limited to, taking an oath of office
as provided in subsection 5 of this section.
2. If a vacancy occurs in the office of trustee, the vacancy shall be filled for the
unexpired term in the same manner as the office was previously filled. No vacancy or
vacancies on the board of trustees shall impair the power of the remaining trustees to
administer the retirement system pending the filling of such vacancies.
3. In the event of a lapse of a school district's corporate organization as described in
subsections 1 and 4 of section 162.081, or for any other reason, the general administration and
the responsibility for the proper operation of the retirement system shall continue to be fully
vested in the trustees then currently serving and such trustees shall continue to serve and be
elected in the same manner as set forth in this statute as if no lapse had occurred, except that
in the event of vacancies occurring in the office of trustees appointed by the board of
education prior to the lapse, the board of trustees shall appoint a qualified person or persons to
fill such vacancy or vacancies for terms of up to four years.

HCS HBs 2884 & 1655 6
4. Trustees shall serve without compensation, and any trustee shall be reimbursed
from the expense fund for all necessary expenses which the trustee may incur through service
on the board of trustees.
5. Each trustee shall, within ten days after such trustee's appointment or election, take
an oath of office before the clerk of the circuit court of the judicial circuit in which the school
district is located that, so far as it devolves upon the trustee, the trustee will diligently and
honestly administer the affairs of the board of trustees and that the trustee will not knowingly
violate or willingly permit to be violated any of the provisions of the law applicable to the
retirement system. Such oath shall be subscribed to by the trustee making it and filed in the
office of the clerk of the circuit court.
6. The circuit court of the judicial circuit in which the school district is located shall
have jurisdiction over the members of the board of trustees to require them to account for
their official conduct in the management and disposition of the funds and property committed
to their charge; to order, decree and compel payment by them to the public school retirement
system of their school district of all sums of money, and of the value of all property which
may have been improperly retained by them, or transferred to others, or which may have been
lost or wasted by any violation of their duties or abuse of their powers as such members of
such board; to remove any such member upon proof that the trustee has abused the trustee's
trust or has violated the duties of the trustee's office; to restrain and prevent any alienation or
disposition of property of such public school retirement system by the members, in cases
where it may be threatened, or there is good reason to apprehend that it is intended to be made
in fraud of the rights and interests of such public school retirement system. The jurisdiction
conferred by sections 169.410 to 169.540 shall be exercised as in ordinary cases upon
petition, filed by the board of education of such school district, or by any two members of the
board of trustees. Such petition shall be heard in a summary manner after ten days' notice in
writing to the member complained of, and an appeal shall lie from the judgment of the circuit
court as in other causes and be speedily determined, but such appeal shall not operate under
any condition as a supersedeas of a judgment of removal from office.
7. Each trustee shall be entitled to one vote in the board of trustees. [Six votes shall be
necessary for a decision by the trustees at any meeting of the board of trustees.] Seven
members of the board of trustees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business at any meeting of the board of trustees. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no
action or decision of the board of trustees shall be effective unless approved by the
affirmative vote of at least seven members of the board of trustees.
8. Subject to the limitations of sections 169.410 to 169.540, the board of trustees
shall, from time to time, establish rules and regulations for the administration of the
retirement system, for eligibility for and determination of benefits under the retirement

HCS HBs 2884 & 1655 7
system, for the investment of retirement system assets, and for the transaction of the
retirement system's business.
9. The board of trustees shall elect from its membership a chairman and shall, by
majority vote of its members, appoint a secretary, who may be, but need not be, one of its
members. It shall engage such actuarial and other services as shall be required to transact the
business of the retirement system. It shall also engage an investment counselor who shall be
experienced in the investment of moneys to advise the trustees on investments of the
retirement system. The compensation of all persons engaged by the board of trustees and all
other expenses of the board necessary for the operation of the retirement system shall be paid
at such rates and in such amounts as the board of trustees shall approve.
10. The board of trustees shall keep in convenient form such data as shall be
necessary for actuarial valuations of the assets of the retirement system and for checking the
experience of the system.
11. The board of trustees shall keep a record of all its proceedings which shall be
open to public inspection. It shall prepare annually and send to the board of education and to
each member of the retirement system a report showing the fiscal transactions of the
100 retirement system for the preceding fiscal year, a detailed listing of all salaries and
101 expenditures incurred by the trustees for its operation, the amount of the accumulated cash
102 and securities of the system, and the last balance sheet showing the financial condition of the
103 system by means of an actuarial valuation of the assets and liabilities of the retirement
104 system. The board of trustees shall also prepare or cause to be prepared an annual report
105 concerning the operation of the retirement system herein provided for, which report shall be
106 sent by the chairman of the board of trustees to the board of education.
107 12. The board of trustees shall arrange for necessary legal advice for the operation of
108 the retirement system.
109 13. The board of trustees shall designate a medical board to be composed of three
110 physicians, none of whom shall be eligible for benefits pursuant to sections 169.410 to
111 169.540, who shall arrange for and pass upon all medical examinations required pursuant to
112 the provisions of sections 169.410 to 169.540, shall investigate all essential statements and
113 certificates made by or on behalf of a member in connection with an application for disability
114 retirement and shall report in writing to the board of trustees its conclusions and
115 recommendations upon all matters referred to it.
116 14. The actuary shall be the technical adviser of the board of trustees on matters
117 regarding the operation of the system created by sections 169.410 to 169.540 and shall
118 perform such other duties as are required in connection therewith. Such person shall be
119 qualified as an actuary by membership as a fellow in the Society of Actuaries or by objective
120 standards which are no less stringent than those established by the Society of Actuaries.

HCS HBs 2884 & 1655 8
121 15. At least once in each five-year period the actuary shall make an investigation into
122 the actuarial experience of the retirement system, and taking into account the results of such
123 investigation of the experience, the board of trustees shall adopt for the retirement system
124 such actuarial assumptions as shall be deemed necessary.
125 16. On the basis of such actuarial assumptions as the board of trustees shall adopt, the
126 actuary shall make an annual valuation of the assets and liabilities of the funds of the
127 retirement system.
128 17. On the basis of the valuation the board of trustees shall certify the rates of
129 contribution payable by the board of education.
✔